el: Περιοχή κάλυψης θωράκισης σώματος: Πλάτη; Στήθος; Αγκώνες/πήχεις; Γοφοί; Νεφρά/μέση; Πλευρά/πλαϊνός κορμός; Ώμοι; Σπονδυλική στήλη (κέντρο πλάτης); Μπράτσα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kūno šarvų dengimo sritis: Nugara; Krūtinė; Alkūnės / dilbiai; Klubai; Inkstai / apatinė nugaros dalis; Šonkauliai / liemens šonai; Pečiai; Stuburas (nugaros centras); Žąstai; Kita
cs: Plocha krytí ochranné vesty / balistické ochrany: Záda; Hrudník; Lokty/předloktí; Boky; Ledviny / spodní část zad; Žebra / boky trupu; Ramena; Páteř (střed zad); Paže; Jiné
es: Área de cobertura de la protección corporal: Espalda; Pecho; Codos/antebrazos; Caderas; Riñones/zona lumbar; Costillas/costados del torso; Hombros; Columna vertebral (centro de la espalda); Parte superior de los brazos; Otro
pt-PT: Área de cobertura da armadura corporal: Costas; Peito; Cotovelos/antebraços; Ancas; Rins/zona lombar; Costelas/parte lateral do tronco; Ombros; Coluna (centro das costas); Parte superior dos braços; Outro
en: Body armor coverage area: Back; Chest; Elbows/forearms; Hips; Kidneys/lower back; Ribs/side torso; Shoulders; Spine (center back); Upper arms; Other
ko: 방탄복 커버 범위: 등; 가슴; 팔꿈치/팔뚝; 엉덩이; 신장/허리 하단; 갈비뼈/옆구리; 어깨; 척추(등 중앙); 상완; 기타
ja: ボディアーマーの適用範囲: 背中; 胸部; 肘/前腕; 臀部; 腎臓/腰下部; 肋骨/胴体側面; 肩; 脊椎（背中中央）; 上腕; その他
sk-SK: Oblasť pokrytia ochrannou vestou: Chrbát; Hrudník; Lakte/predlaktia; Boky; Oblasť obličiek/krížov; Rebrá/bočná časť trupu; Ramená; Chrbtica (stred chrbta); Nadlaktia; Iné
vi: Diện tích bảo vệ của áo giáp: Lưng; Ngực; Khuỷu tay/cẳng tay; Hông; Thận/thắt lưng; Xương sườn/cạnh thân; Vai; Cột sống (giữa lưng); Cánh tay trên; Khác
hu: Mellkasvédő lefedettségi területe: Hát; Mellkas; Könyök/alkar; Csípő; Vese/derék; Bordák/törzs oldala; Váll; Gerinc (hát közepe); Felkar; Egyéb
de: Schutzbereich der Körperschutzweste: Rücken; Brust; Ellbogen/Unterarme; Hüften; Nieren/unterer Rücken; Rippen/seitlicher Oberkörper; Schultern; Wirbelsäule (Mitte des Rückens); Oberarme; Sonstige
hr-HR: Područje pokrivenosti oklopnog prsluka: Leđa; Prsa; Laktovi/podlaktice; Bokovi; Bubrezi / donji dio leđa; Rebra / bočni dio torza; Ramena; Kralježnica (sredina leđa); Nadlaktice; Ostalo
sl-SI: Območje pokritosti ščitnika za telo: Hrbet; Prsni koš; Komolci/podlahti; Boki; Ledvice/spodnji del hrbta; Rebra/stranski del trupa; Ramena; Hrbtenica (sredina hrbta); Nadlahti; Drugo
nb: Dekningsområde for kroppspansring: Rygg; Bryst; Albuer/underarmer; Hofter; Nyrer/korsrygg; Ribbein/side av overkropp; Skuldre; Ryggrad (midt på ryggen); Overarmer; Annet
th: พื้นที่การปกป้องของเกราะป้องกันร่างกาย: หลัง; หน้าอก; ข้อศอก/ท่อนแขน; สะโพก; ไต/หลังส่วนล่าง; ซี่โครง/สีข้าง; ไหล่; กระดูกสันหลัง (กลางหลัง); ต้นแขน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 护甲防护区域: 背部; 胸部; 手肘/前臂; 臀部; 肾脏/下背部; 肋骨/躯干两侧; 肩部; 脊椎（背部中央）; 上臂; 其他
tr: Vücut zırhı koruma alanı: Sırt; Göğüs; Dirsekler/ön kollar; Kalça; Böbrekler/bel; Kaburgalar/yan gövde; Omuzlar; Omurga (orta sırt); Üst kollar; Diğer
fr: Zone couverte par la protection corporelle: Dos; Poitrine; Coudes/avant-bras; Hanches; Reins/bas du dos; Côtes/côtés du torse; Épaules; Colonne vertébrale (milieu du dos); Haut des bras; Autre
sv: Område för kroppsskydd: Rygg; Bröst; Armbågar/underarmar; Höfter; Njurar/ländrygg; Revben/bål; Axlar; Ryggrad (mitten av ryggen); Överarmar; Annat
bg-BG: Зона на покритие на защитната екипировка: Гръб; Гърди; Лакти/предмишници; Ханш; Бъбреци/кръст; Ребра/странична част на торса; Рамене; Гръбначен стълб (централна част на гърба); Горна част на ръцете; Друго
zh-TW: 防彈衣覆蓋區域: 背部; 胸部; 手肘/前臂; 臀部; 腎臟/下背部; 肋骨/側軀幹; 肩部; 脊椎 (背部中央); 上臂; 其他
ru: Зона покрытия брони: Спина; Грудь; Локти/предплечья; Бёдра; Поясница; Рёбра/бока; Плечи; Позвоночник (центр спины); Верхняя часть рук; Другое
nl: Kogelwerende bescherming dekkingsgebied: Rug; Borstkas; Ellebogen/onderarmen; Heupen; Nieren/onderrug; Ribben/flanken; Schouders; Wervelkolom (middenrug); Bovenarmen; Overige
ro-RO: Zona de acoperire pentru armura de corp: Spate; Piept; Coate/antebrațe; Șolduri; Rinichi/zona lombară; Coaste/trunchi lateral; Umeri; Coloană (centrul spatelui); Partea superioară a brațelor; Altele
da: Dækningsområde for skudsikre veste: Ryg; Bryst; Albuer/underarme; Hofter; Nyrer/lænd; Ribben/sidetorso; Skuldre; Rygsøjle (midt på ryggen); Overarme; Andet
it: Area di copertura del giubbotto antiproiettile: Schiena; Torace; Gomiti/avambracci; Fianchi; Reni/zona lombare; Costole/lato del busto; Spalle; Colonna vertebrale (centro schiena); Parte superiore delle braccia; Altro
pt-BR: Área de cobertura da armadura corporal: Costas; Peito; Cotovelos/antebraços; Quadris; Rins/lombar; Costelas/lateral do tronco; Ombros; Coluna (centro das costas); Braços (parte superior); Outros
fi: Pohjapanssarin peittämä alue: Selkä; Rinta; Kyynärpäät/kyynärvarret; Lantio; Munuaiset/alaselkä; Kylkiluut/vartalon kyljet; Hartiat; Selkäranka (keskiselkä); Olkavarret; Muu
pl: Obszar ochrony pancerza osobistego: Plecy; Klatka piersiowa; Łokcie / przedramiona; Biodra; Nerki / dolna część pleców; Żebra / boki tułowia; Barki; Kręgosłup (środek pleców); Ramiona; Inne